North Carolina statutes. Chapter 157. Housing Authorities and Projects.
Article 3. Eminent Domain.

§ 157-48.
Finding and declaration of necessity.

It is hereby declared that insanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in various areas of the State and that consequently many persons of low income are forced to reside in such dwelling accommodations; that these conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals and welfare of the citizens of the State and impair economic values; that the clearance, replanning and reconstruction of the areas in which insanitary or unsafe housing conditions exist and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income are public uses and purposes for which private property may be acquired; that it is in the public interest that work on such projects be instituted as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency; and the necessity in the public interest for the provision hereinafter enacted, is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History.

1935, c. 409, s. 1.

§ 157-49.
Housing project.

The term “housing project” whenever used in this Article shall mean any undertaking (i) to demolish, clear, remove, alter or repair unsafe or insanitary housing and/or (ii) to provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and said term may also include such buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies for educational, health or welfare purposes, and such necessary utilities as are designed primarily for the benefit and use of the occupants of such dwelling accommodations.

History.

1935, c. 409, s. 2.

§ 157-50.
Eminent domain for housing projects.

Any corporation which is an agency of the United States of America shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including improvements and fixtures thereon, which it may deem necessary for a housing project being constructed, operated or aided by it or the United States of America. Any corporation borrowing money or receiving other financial assistance from the United States of America or any agency thereof for the purpose of financing the construction or operation of any housing project or projects, the operation of which will be subject to public supervision or regulation, shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including fixtures and improvements thereon, which it may deem necessary for such project. A housing project shall be deemed to be subject to public supervision or regulation within the meaning of this Article if the rents to be charged by it are in any way subject to the supervision, regulation or approval of the United States of America, the State or any of their subdivisions or agencies, or by a housing authority, city, municipality or county, whether such right to supervise, regulate or approve be by virtue of any law, statute, contract or otherwise.

Any such corporate agency of the United States of America or any such corporation, upon the adoption of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use, may exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 40A.

History.

1935, c. 409, s. 3; 1981, c. 919, s. 26.

Cross References.

As to exercise of eminent domain by housing authorities, see

G.S. 157-11

.

§ 157-51.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 149.